Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall request a waiver from the United States department of agriculture to exclude unhealthy foods from the definition of eligible foods under 7 C.F.R. Sec. 271.2. If such a wavier is granted, then the director shall prohibit the purchase of candy and sweetened beverages with benefits provided through the supplemental nutrition assistance program. If no such waiver is granted, then the department shall request such a waiver annually until such waiver is granted.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" shall not include any preparation containing flour and shall require no refrigeration.(b)(i) "Sweetened beverages" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or artificial sweeteners.(ii) "Sweetened beverages" does not include any beverages: (A) That contain milk or milk substitutes; (B) that are greater than 50 percent vegetable or fruit juice by volume; (C) that require preparation before consumption, such as powders or concentrates; (D) commonly referred to as "infant" or "baby" formula; (E) marketed primarily as sports drinks for hydration; (F) suitable for human consumption and manufactured as a source of necessary nutrition due to a medical condition or for use as an oral rehydration electrolyte solution for infants and children formulated to prevent or treat dehydration due to illness.(c) "Unhealthy foods" includes candy and sweetened beverages.--- END ---